Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.060

Contents of petition.

Such petition shall contain a copy of said ordinance, certified by the clerk under the corporate seal, a reasonably accurate description of the lots, parcels of land and property which will be taken or damaged, and the names of the owners and occupants thereof and of persons having any interest therein, so far as known, to the officer filing the petition or appearing from the records in the office of the county auditor.

[ 1907 c 153 s 4; RRS s 9218. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 4; 1893 c 84 s 4.]